Louisiana, session 2026, HB578.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Civil Code Article 14 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
Art. 14. Use of gender sex
Unless the context indicates otherwise, words used with reference to one
gender sex apply to the other genders sex.
Section 2. R.S. 1:8 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§8. One gender sex may denote others the other; definition of sex
A. Words used in reference to one gender sex apply also to the other genders
sex, except as otherwise clearly indicated by the context.
B. "Sex" means an individual's biological sex, either male or female, as
observed or clinically certified at birth. "Gender identity" and other subjective terms
shall not be used as synonyms or substitutes for the term "sex".
Section 3. R.S. 3:1493(E) and 2074(E) are hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
§1493. Louisiana Industrial Hemp Promotion and Research Advisory Board;
creation and organization
* * *
E. Appointments to the board shall be made no later than September 1, 2022.
Each appointing authority shall notify the commissioner of the appointment. The
Page 2 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
board should be representative of the state's population by race and gender sex to
ensure diversity.
* * *
§2074. Louisiana Equine Promotion and Research Advisory Board; creation and
organization
* * *
E. An organization authorized to make nominations for appointment to the
board shall submit its list of nominees within thirty days after the commissioner
requests the list. The commissioner shall make all appointments to the board no later
than thirty days after receiving the list of nominees. The board should be
representative of the state's population by race and gender sex to ensure diversity.
* * *
Section 4. R.S. 4:158.2(A)(2) and 193(B) are hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
§158.2. Quarterly reporting of professional services information
A. Each association or licensee as defined in R.S. 4:143 shall submit to the
commission, the Senate Committee on Judiciary B, and the House Committee on
Commerce all of the following:
* * *
(2) A report on the demographic information of the association's or licensee's
workforce, including but not limited to race, gender sex, and Louisiana residency.
* * *
§193. Categories of persons subject to exclusion and ejection; civil liberties
* * *
B. No person may be excluded or ejected on account of race, color, creed,
national origin, ancestry, disability, as defined in R.S. 51:2232, or gender sex.
* * *
Section 5. R.S. 9:2720(D) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
Page 3 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
§2720. Enforceability of gestational carrier contract
* * *
D. No person shall enter into a gestational carrier contract that requires the
gestational carrier to consent to terminate a pregnancy resulting from in utero
embryo transfer for any reason, including a prenatal diagnosis of an actual or
potential disability, impairment, genetic variation, or any other health condition or
a discrimination based on gender sex, or for the purposes of the reduction of multiple
fetuses. Any such provision in a contract executed in the state of Louisiana or any
other state shall be absolutely null and unenforceable in the state of Louisiana as
contrary to public policy.
Section 6. R.S. 11:3390 and 3662 are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§3390. Beneficiaries
For the purposes of this Part, whenever reference is made to gender sex, the
masculine shall include the feminine, the feminine shall include the masculine, and
in particular with reference to Sections 3363, 3378, 3379, 3385, and 3388 without
limiting the generality of the above, whenever reference is made to widows of
members of the fire department, it shall also apply to widowers of said members.
* * *
§3662. One gender sex may denote others the other
For the purposes of this Subpart, whenever reference is made to gender sex,
the masculine shall include the feminine, the feminine shall include the masculine,
and in particular with reference to Sections 3631, 3648, 3656, and 3660; without
limiting the generality of the above, whenever reference is made to widows of
members, it shall also apply to widowers of said members.
Section 7. R.S. 13:1856(1) and 1857(A)(8)(d)(ii) and (iii) are hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
§1856. Contents of petition
A petition under this Part shall be verified and include a copy of any existing
child-custody determination, if available. The petition shall specify the risk factors
Page 4 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
for abduction, including the relevant factors described in R.S. 13:1857. Subject to
the provisions of R.S. 13:1821(E), if reasonably ascertainable, the petition shall
contain:
(1) The name, date of birth, and gender sex of the child.
* * *
§1857. Factors to determine risk of abduction
A. In determining whether there is a credible risk of abduction of a child, the
court shall consider all of the following factors and any evidence that the petitioner
or respondent:
* * *
(8) Is likely to take the child to a country that either:
* * *
(d) Has laws or practices that would either:
* * *
(ii) Restrict the petitioner from freely traveling to or exiting from the country
because of the petitioner's gender sex, nationality, marital status, or religion.
(iii) Restrict the child's ability legally to leave the country after the child
reaches the age of majority because of a child's gender sex, nationality, or religion.
* * *
Section 8. R.S. 14:107.2(A) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§107.2. Hate crimes
A. It shall be unlawful for any person to select the victim of the following
offenses against person and property because of actual or perceived race, age, gender
sex, religion, color, creed, disability, sexual orientation, national origin, or ancestry
of that person or the owner or occupant of that property or because of actual or
perceived membership or service in, or employment with, an organization, or
because of actual or perceived employment as a law enforcement officer, firefighter,
or emergency medical services personnel: first or second degree murder;
manslaughter; battery; aggravated battery; second degree battery; aggravated assault
with a firearm; terrorizing; menacing; mingling harmful substances; simple or third
Page 5 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
degree rape, forcible or second degree rape, or aggravated or first degree rape; sexual
battery; second degree sexual battery; oral sexual battery; carnal knowledge of a
juvenile; indecent behavior with juveniles; molestation of a juvenile or a person with
a physical or mental disability; simple, second degree, or aggravated kidnapping;
simple or aggravated arson; communicating of false information of planned arson;
simple or aggravated criminal damage to property; contamination of water supplies;
simple or aggravated burglary; criminal trespass; simple, first degree, or armed
robbery; purse snatching; extortion; theft; desecration of graves; institutional
vandalism; or assault by drive-by shooting.
* * *
Section 9. R.S. 15:827.3(A)(2)(c)(i), 832(A), 905(F)(13)(b) and (14)(a)(ii) and
(d)(ii), 933(D)(4)(introductory paragraph) and (E)(1)(introductory paragraph), 934(B)(4),
1110(D)(3), 1204.2(B)(4), and 1228.9(D)(1)(a) are hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
§827.3. Savings attributable to criminal justice reforms; data collection and
reporting requirements to the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget
A.
* * *
(2) Each fiscal year, the annual savings shall be allocated as follows:
* * *
(c) Forty-five percent shall be allocated to the Louisiana Community and
Technical College System for targeted investments in educational and vocational
training aimed at recidivism reduction programming for adult and juvenile offenders.
Such funds shall be utilized in connection with any other available sources of federal
or state aid or training funds. The Louisiana Community and Technical College
System shall provide a report to the legislature by December fifteenth of each year
which shall include but not be limited to the following:
(i) A detailed description of the number of people trained categorized by age,
race, gender sex, and geographic region.
* * *
Page 6 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
§832. Work by inmates; allowance
A. The department shall provide employment opportunities and vocational
training for all inmates, regardless of gender sex, consistent with available resources,
physical custody, and appropriate classification criteria. Insofar as is possible, the
equipment used in such programs, the conditions of employment, the management
practices, and the general operating procedures thereof shall approximate those of
private industry. The provisions of Part IX of Chapter 2 of Title 51 of the Louisiana
Revised Statutes of 1950 with respect to prison-made goods shall be applicable to
goods made, manufactured, or produced by the inmates of all institutions and
facilities, under the jurisdiction of the department.
* * *
§905. Rules and regulations; education; training and discipline; work opportunities;
vocational training; contracts and agreements; solitary confinement
* * *
F.
* * *
(13) Every instance of solitary confinement shall be documented
electronically and in the aggregate. Unidentified data on the frequency and length
of time that the juvenile spends in solitary confinement shall be available upon
request as a public record. Documentation of the solitary confinement shall include
all of the following:
* * *
(b) The race, ethnicity, age, gender sex, and disability status of the juvenile.
* * *
(14)(a) The office of juvenile justice shall submit a report on the use of
solitary confinement quarterly to the Juvenile Justice Reform Act Commission. This
report shall include all of the following:
* * *
Page 7 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
(ii) The race, ethnicity, age, gender sex, and disability status of each juvenile
placed in solitary confinement.
* * *
(d) The office of juvenile justice shall post a report on the use of solitary
confinement on its website quarterly with deidentified aggregate data including but
not limited to all of the following:
* * *
(ii) Race and ethnicity, age, and gender sex of juveniles placed in solitary
confinement.
* * *
§933. Office of juvenile justice; statistical data collection; reporting
* * *
D. Data to be collected and maintained. The data collected and maintained
under this Section shall include but not be limited to the following data points for
each child served:
* * *
(4) Gender Sex.
* * *
E. Data to be reported. The reports mandated by the office of juvenile
justice shall include but not be limited to the following data:
(1) Disaggregated by race, ethnicity, gender sex, parish of prosecution, and
most serious offense of adjudication, data including:
* * *
§934. Detention centers
* * *
B. The data collected and maintained shall include but not be limited to the
following information for each child:
* * *
(4) Gender Sex.
* * *
Page 8 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
§1110. Purpose and reasons for detention; detention standards; licensing; fees
* * *
D.
* * *
(3) A copy of the completed detention screening instrument shall be
provided to the juvenile detention facility for any child who is admitted into its
custody. The juvenile detention facility shall keep a record of the results of the
detention screening instrument and the recommendation made based upon the
instrument to either detain the child, release the child with conditions, or release the
child without conditions. This record shall include the parish in which the child was
taken into custody, the most serious charge for which the child was taken into
custody, and demographic information about the child including but not limited to
race, ethnicity, gender sex, and age. This information shall be aggregated and
submitted quarterly to the Louisiana Commission on Law Enforcement and
Administration of Criminal Justice which shall annually provide such information
to the JDAI Collaborative.
* * *
§1204.2. Creation of system; functions; powers; duties
* * *
B. The system, by and through the commission, shall have the following
functions, powers, and duties:
* * *
(4) To prepare and distribute, to all such persons and agencies, forms to be
used in reporting data to the system. The forms shall provide for information
regarding crimes which are directed against individuals or groups, or their property,
by reason of their actual or perceived race, age, gender sex, religion, color, creed,
disability, sexual orientation, national origin, or ancestry or by reason of their actual
or perceived membership or service in, or employment with, an organization as
defined in R.S. 14:107.2. The forms shall also provide for other items of information
Page 9 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
needed by federal and state bureaus or departments engaged in the development of
national and state statistics.
* * *
§1228.9. Impaired Driver Tracking System; purpose; procedure
* * *
D.(1) Every law enforcement agency in this state, including but not limited
to city police departments, sheriffs' offices, and state police shall submit the
following information to the impaired driver tracking system component of ICJIS,
when a person is arrested for any offense listed in Subsection C of this Section:
(a) The law enforcement agency making the arrest shall provide sufficient
information about the arrested person so that other law enforcement agencies, courts,
the Department of Public Safety and Corrections, and other relevant persons or
agencies can identify the person arrested, including but not limited to name, address,
driver's license number, date of birth, and physical characteristics, such as eye color,
hair color, and gender sex.
* * *
Section 10. R.S. 17:17.5(B)(2), 100.13(G)(2)(f) and (J), 221.3(B)(2)(d), 416(M),
416.21(N)(3)(a) and (b)(i)(aa) and (bb), 1519.7(C), 1871(A)(3), 1998, 3047.7(B)(2)(a),
3351(B)(2)(b)(ii), 3399.12(5)(i), 3911(B)(1)(i)(introductory paragraph) and
(4)(a)(introductory paragraph), 3991(A)(1)(c)(iv) and (B)(3), and 5067(B)(7) are hereby
amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§17.5. Physical fitness assessment; statewide expansion program
* * *
B. For purposes of the expansion program, the Cecil J. Picard Center, in
collaboration with the Department of Education and the Louisiana Department of
Health, shall continue use of the physical fitness assessment instrument used for the
pilot program which shall:
* * *
Page 10 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
(2) Include criterion-referenced standards specific to a student's race, age,
and gender sex and based on the physical fitness level required for good health.
* * *
§100.13. Expanded academic support
* * *
G.
* * *
(2) In approving high-quality tutoring providers, the department shall require
the tutoring providers to:
* * *
(f) Provide evidence of impact on student outcomes disaggregated by student
groups according to race, gender sex, ethnicity, economically disadvantaged
students, English language learner status, disability status, and geographic location.
Tutoring providers may demonstrate impact through either adherence to the
program's model design by aligning with the components of high-dosage tutoring or
by having evidence of positive and statistically significant gains in student learning
outcomes based on a well-designed randomized controlled trial or
quasi-experimental design that provides the basis for evidence of causal program
impact and which is conducted by an external third-party researcher.
* * *
J. The department shall create reporting templates, procedures, and
definitions for reporting metrics for city, parish, and other local public school boards
to use in collecting and reporting tutoring-related data to the department including
changes in academic performance of participating students disaggregated by student
groups according to race, gender sex, ethnicity, economically disadvantaged
students, English language learner status, disability status, and geographic location.
To the extent possible, the department shall leverage existing reporting processes and
systems to reduce the reporting burden on local education agencies and public
charter schools.
* * *
Page 11 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
§221.3. Student enrollment notification; required schools and programs; content
* * *
B.
* * *
(2) Such notification shall:
* * *
(d) Be a written notification of enrollment which may be a written request
for a student's transcript if such transcript request occurs after the student has been
accepted for enrollment, with such written request or notification containing at a
minimum the student's legal name, date of birth, gender sex, and race.
* * *
§416. Discipline of students; suspension; expulsion
* * *
M. The state Department of Education shall publish annually and publish on
its website data regarding disciplinary removals disaggregated at the state, system,
and school level and also disaggregated and capable of cross-tabulation by the
characteristics of gender sex, race, disability, English language learner status, and
economically disadvantaged status. In reporting such data, the department shall
comply with all federal and state privacy laws and shall strive to ensure that all
relevant state accountability metrics are valid and reliable.
* * *
§416.21. Behavior of students with exceptionalities; use of seclusion and physical
restraint
* * *
N.
* * *
(3)(a) The state Department of Education shall maintain a database of all
reported incidents of seclusion and physical restraint of students with
exceptionalities and shall disaggregate the data for analysis by school; student age,
Page 12 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
race, ethnicity, and gender sex; student disability, where applicable; and any
involved school employees.
(b)(i) Based upon the data collected, the state Department of Education shall
annually compile a comprehensive report regarding the use of seclusion and physical
restraint of students with exceptionalities, which shall at a minimum include the
following:
(aa) The number of incidents of physical restraint disaggregated by school
system; student age, race, ethnicity, gender sex, and student disability classification.
(bb) The number of incidents of seclusion disaggregated by school system;
student age, race, ethnicity, gender sex, and student disability classification.
* * *
§1519.7. Hospital advisory committees
* * *
C. In selecting community advisory committee members, an effort shall be
made to reflect the demographic diversity of the community the hospital serves
including age, gender sex, race, and other relevant factors. The board shall solicit
and accept nominations from the community at large and from organizations
representing community interests, including without limitation health professionals,
religious and community leaders, consumer advocates, and consumers of hospital
services.
* * *
§1871. Board of Supervisors of Community and Technical Colleges; establishment;
members; qualifications and terms; vacancies; duties
A.
* * *
(3) The board should be representative of the state's population by race and
gender sex to ensure diversity.
* * *
Page 13 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
§1998. Advisory councils
The board, upon the recommendation of the directors of postsecondary
vocational-technical schools, shall appoint an advisory council on career education
for each school. The members of all such advisory councils in this state shall serve
without pay. Each such council shall be limited to fifteen members and be
representative of the state's population by race and gender sex to ensure diversity and
shall be representative equally of employee, employer, and educational and public
interests.
* * *
§3047.7. Reporting system; implementation; requirements; applicability;
participation by eligible institutions
* * *
B. The information reporting system shall include the following:
* * *
(2)(a) Demographic information of award recipients, including age, race,
gender sex, and household income.
* * *
§3351. General powers, duties, and functions of postsecondary education
management boards
* * *
B. In addition to the powers and duties vested by Subsection A of this
Section and any other applicable laws, each board, as soon as practicable, shall
adopt:
* * *
(2) Rules and regulations which may provide for:
* * *
(b)
* * *
(ii) Such rules and regulations may include the establishment, award, and
continuance of tuition waivers to any student for purposes of gender sex equity who
Page 14 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
participates in an intercollegiate athletic program and who is pursuing an
undergraduate degree provided that the student meets the academic standards and
complies with the rules and regulations of the college or university such student is
attending relative to requirements for attendance as a full-time student. The tuition
waivers may be offered at any campus under the jurisdiction of each management
board; however, no management board shall issue more than an aggregate of fifty
tuition waivers per campus during an academic year and not more than fifty percent
of such tuition waivers shall be issued to out-of-state residents.
* * *
§3399.12. Definitions
As used in this Part, the following terms have the following meanings unless
the context clearly indicates otherwise:
* * *
(5) "Power-based violence" means any form of interpersonal violence
intended to control or intimidate another person through the assertion of power over
the person and shall include the following:
* * *
(i) Unwelcome sexual or sex- or gender-based conduct that is objectively
offensive, has a discriminatory intent, and lacks a bona fide academic purpose.
* * *
§3911. Data collection system; establishment
* * *
B.(1)
* * *
(i) Student discipline information, in total and by unduplicated counts,
disaggregated by race, ethnicity, gender, sex, English learner status, and students
with exceptionalities, excluding gifted and talented, in accordance with data
collection conducted pursuant to 20 U.S.C. 3413(c)(1), including but not limited to
the following:
* * *
Page 15 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
(4)(a) The department shall annually collect the following data elements for
students with an exceptionality by each disability classification, including breakouts
of each speech or language impairment category and breakouts of each intellectual
disability category, not including students identified exclusively as gifted and
talented, for each city, parish, or other local public school board. The following data
elements shall be reported for each disability classification in total as well as by
unduplicated counts by race, gender, age, and sex:
* * *
§3991. Charter schools; requirements; limitations; renewal; amendment; revocation;
board membership
A.(1)
* * *
(c)
* * *
(iv) Beginning with the 2019-2020 school year, the governing or
management board of each charter school, other than a Type 2 charter school,
located in a parish with a population of between three hundred twenty-five thousand
and three hundred seventy-five thousand persons, based on the most recent federal
decennial census, shall be representative of the community in which the charter
school is located by race and gender sex to ensure diversity, and no fewer than sixty
percent of its members shall reside in the parish in which the school is located.
* * *
B. Each proposed charter shall contain or make provision for the following:
* * *
(3) Admission requirements, if any, that are consistent with the school's role,
scope, and mission may be established pursuant to rules promulgated by the state
board. Such admission requirements shall be specific and shall include a system for
admission decisions which precludes exclusion of pupils based on race, religion,
gender sex, ethnicity, national origin, intelligence level as ascertained by an
intelligence quotient examination, identification as a student with an exceptionality
Page 16 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
as defined in R.S. 17:1942(B), or identification as a student who is economically
disadvantaged. Such admission requirements may include, however, specific
requirements related to a school's mission such as auditions for schools with a
performing arts mission or proficiency in a foreign language for schools with a
language immersion mission. Any school which was chartered prior to July 1, 2012,
and which incorporated achievement of a certain academic record as part of its
admission requirements may continue to use such admission requirements. No local
board shall assign any pupil to attend a charter school, except that a local board in
a district in which fifty percent or more of the public schools in the district are
charter schools and that uses a single application and enrollment process adopted by
the local board for public school enrollment may assign a pupil to a charter school
based on such enrollment process, the preferences of the pupil's parent or legal
guardian, the charter school's admission requirements, the charter contract, and the
local board's policies.
* * *
§5067. Program information reporting system; implementation; requirements;
applicability; participation by eligible institutions and others
* * *
B. The Taylor Opportunity Program for Students information reporting
system shall include but not be limited to the following:
* * *
(7) Demographic information of program award recipients, including but not
limited to race and gender sex.
* * *
Section 11. R.S. 22:1204(A)(10)(b), 1504(l), 1545(I)(1)(introductory paragraph) and
(J), 1808.2(H), 2161(B), 2187(D)(4), and 2503(9)(b)(introductory paragraph) are hereby
amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1204. Board of directors
A. The board of directors shall be composed of the commissioner of
insurance or his designee, who shall serve as an ex officio, nonvoting member of the
Page 17 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
board, and twelve members to be selected from the groups and in the manner as
follows:
* * *
(10)
* * *
(b) The commissioner shall make all diligent efforts to make selections from
these three groups that will represent a racial, ethnic, and gender sex reflection of the
state for the board of directors.
* * *
§1504. Use of credit information
An insurer authorized to do business in Louisiana that uses credit information
to underwrite or rate risks shall not:
(1) Use an insurance score that is calculated using income, gender sex,
address, zip code, ethnic group, religion, marital status, or nationality of the
consumer as a factor.
* * *
§1545. Examination
* * *
I.(1) The commissioner of insurance shall prepare, publicly announce, and
publish a report that summarizes statistical information relating to life insurance
producer examinations administered during the preceding calendar year. Each report
shall include the following information for all examinees combined and separately
by gender sex, race or ethnicity, race or ethnicity within gender sex, education level,
and native language:
* * *
J. The commissioner of insurance may provide to a testing service provider
under contract with the Department of Insurance any demographic information
received by the department on applications relating to examinations taken to qualify
for an insurance producer license if the commissioner requires the provider to review
Page 18 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
and analyze examination results in conjunction with the education level, gender sex,
native language, race, or ethnicity of examinees.
* * *
§1808.2. Examination
* * *
H. The commissioner of insurance may provide to a testing service provider
under contract with the Department of Insurance any demographic information
received by the department on applications relating to examinations taken to qualify
for an insurance consultant license if the commissioner requires the provider to
review and analyze examination results in conjunction with the education level,
gender sex, native language, race, or ethnicity of examinees.
* * *
§2161. Powers of the commissioner; creation of advisory boards
* * *
B. The commissioner shall appoint the members of any advisory board
created pursuant to this Section. The commissioner shall ensure that his
appointments demonstrate race, gender sex, ethnic, and geographical diversity. The
commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act providing for the creation, governance, duties, and
termination of any advisory board created pursuant to this Section.
* * *
§2187. Actuarial reviews of proposed healthcare legislation
* * *
D. Contractors shall provide all of the following in the report of an actuarial
review performed pursuant to this Section:
* * *
(4) If available, information concerning who would benefit from any cost
changes and health benefits from the legislative proposal, as identified in Paragraphs
(C)(3) through (8) of this Section, and any disproportionate effects that the
Page 19 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
legislative proposal would have on state residents, which information, if available,
shall be disaggregated, at a minimum, by race, ethnicity, sex, gender sex, and age.
* * *
§2503. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following definitions apply:
* * *
(9) "Nonpublic information" means electronic information that is not
publicly available information and is any of the following:
* * *
(b) Any information or data, except age or gender sex, in any form or
medium created by or derived from a healthcare provider or a consumer, that can be
used to identify a particular consumer, and that relates to any of the following:
* * *
Section 12. R.S. 23:2043(B)(1) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§2043. Members
* * *
B.(1) In making the appointments, the governor shall, as nearly as
practicable, appoint members in a manner that is representative of the population of
the regions of the state and shall consider factors including but not limited to race,
color, religion, gender sex, and national origin.
* * *
Section 13. R.S. 27:46(B) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§46. Quarterly reporting of professional services and employment information
* * *
B. In addition to the report required by Subsection A of this Section, each
holder of a license as defined in R.S. 27:44 shall submit to the board, the Senate
Committee on Judiciary B, and the House Committee on the Administration of
Criminal Justice a report of the demographic information of their workforce,
including but not limited to race, gender sex, and Louisiana residency.
* * *
Page 20 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
Section 14. R.S. 32:398.10(A)(2) and 429.3 are hereby amended and reenacted to
read as follows:
§398.10. Collection and reporting of statistical information relating to traffic stops
A. All law enforcement officers defined as a peace officer in R.S. 40:2402
shall record and retain the following information:
* * *
(2) Characteristics of race, gender sex, age, and state of residence of such
persons, provided the identification of such characteristics shall be based on the
observation and perception of the law enforcement officer responsible for reporting
the stop and the information shall not be required to be provided by the person
stopped.
* * *
§429.3. Collection and reporting of statistical information relating to migration of
residents
The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor vehicles,
shall collect statistical information regarding the gender sex and age of residents
moving from parish to parish and residents moving into and out of Louisiana. The
office of motor vehicles shall provide a report of this information, sorted by age, by
gender sex, by parish, and by state, to the governor, the lieutenant governor, and the
secretaries of each state department annually on or before January first of each year.
* * *
Section 15. R.S. 33:130.302(A)(2), 130.882(A)(2), 363(D), 2740.70.3(B)(2),
4071(A)(6), and 4720.301(G)(2) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§130.302. Board of commissioners; members; officers; employees
A.
* * *
(2) All commissioners shall be qualified voters and taxpayers within the
limits of the district during their term of office and shall reside in St. Landry Parish
or within an adjoining parish. In making appointments to the commission, the
appointing authorities shall make every effort within the law to provide for racial and
Page 21 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
gender sex diversity among commissioners and shall make reasonable efforts to
ensure that the racial proportion of the appointees reflects the same racial proportion
of St. Landry Parish.
* * *
§130.882. Board of commissioners; members; officers; employees
A.
* * *
(2) Each commissioner shall be a qualified voter and taxpayer within the
limits of the district during his term of office and shall reside in St. Martin Parish.
In making appointments to the commission, the appointing authorities shall make
every effort within the law to provide for racial and gender sex diversity among
commissioners and shall make reasonable efforts to ensure that the racial proportion
of the appointees reflects the same racial proportion of St. Martin Parish.
* * *
§363. Village of Palmetto in St. Landry Parish; authority to provide academic
scholarships
* * *
D. Such ordinance or resolution shall provide procedures and criteria for
application for and award of such scholarships. Each student to whom a scholarship
is awarded shall be a resident of the village of Palmetto in St. Landry Parish, shall
be accepted to attend or be enrolled as an undergraduate student in a Louisiana
institution of higher education, shall have a cumulative high school or college grade
point average of at least three points when calculated on a four-point basis, and shall
be adjudged needy by standards equivalent to or more stringent than those of
nationally recognized analyses such as those used by the College Scholarship Service
or the American College Testing Service. In the event that no student meets the
residency criterion, a scholarship may be awarded to a student whose parent or legal
guardian is a utility customer of the village in good standing. The village governing
authority may establish additional criteria and procedures as are necessary to
administer the scholarships. In the administration of the program, no student shall
Page 22 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
be discriminated against on the basis of race, color, gender sex, disability, as defined
in R.S. 51:2232, national origin, or creed.
* * *
§2740.70.3. Evangeline Economic Development Authority
* * *
B.
* * *
(2) The members of the board shall include representatives from the business
community, health care, legal and professional services, small business owners,
financial institutions, manufacturing or service companies, local and regional
educational systems or institutions, and parish and municipal government
organizations. The board shall be representative of the parish's population by age,
race, and gender sex to ensure diversity.
* * *
§4071. Creation and organization of sewerage and water board
A.
* * *
(6) The appointments to the board shall reflect the racial and gender sex
diversity of the population of the city of New Orleans to the extent practicable.
* * *
§4720.301. Shreveport Implementation and Redevelopment Authority
* * *
G.
* * *
(2) The board shall be representative of the city's population by race and
gender sex to ensure diversity.
* * *
Section 16. R.S. 36:108(B)(5) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§108. Offices; purposes and functions
* * *
Page 23 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
B. The office of economic development shall perform the following
functions of the state:
* * *
(5) The office shall provide services to small and medium-sized businesses
in Louisiana, without regard to race or gender sex, and encourage and support the
startup of new small businesses and the growth and retention of existing Louisiana
firms.
* * *
Section 17. R.S. 37:832(A)(2), 914(B)(3), 962(C), 1042(B)(1)(b), 1104(A),
1172(A), 2102(A)(2), 2353(A)(2), 2403(H), 2407(D), 2455(B)(1), 2704(A)(introductory
paragraph), 3061(A)(2)(c), 3084(B)(2), 3201(B)(2), 3386.2(C), 3389(C), 3444(A),
3463(B)(1), 3554(A)(2), and 3703(B)(3) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§832. Louisiana State Board of Embalmers and Funeral Directors; appointments;
terms of office
A.
* * *
(2) The board shall consist of nine members to be appointed by the governor,
subject to Senate confirmation, as further provided in Subsection B of this Section.
All members of the board shall serve at the pleasure of the governor for terms of four
years. The governor shall ensure that his appointments demonstrate race, gender sex,
ethnic, and geographical diversity.
* * *
§914. Louisiana State Board of Nursing; appointment of members; term of office;
vacancy; officers; compensation
* * *
B.
* * *
(3) The governor shall ensure that his appointments demonstrate race, gender
sex, ethnic, and geographical diversity.
* * *
Page 24 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
§962. Louisiana State Board of Practical Nurse Examiners; method of appointment
* * *
C. The appointment of members of the board shall be made from a list,
containing twice the number of eligibles to be appointed, submitted to the governor
by the Louisiana State Medical Society where the appointee shall be a licensed
physician, by the Louisiana Federation of Licensed Practical Nurses, Inc., for one of
the practical nurses, by the Licensed Practical Nurses of Louisiana, Inc., for one of
the practical nurses, by the Louisiana Nursing Home Association, for one practical
nurse, by the Louisiana Hospital Association, for one practical nurse, or by the
Louisiana State Nurses Association where the appointee shall be a registered nurse.
The consumer member may apply directly to the office of the governor. The
governor shall ensure that his appointments demonstrate race, gender sex, ethnic, and
geographical diversity.
* * *
§1042. Louisiana State Board of Optometry Examiners; appointment; terms of
members; protected action and communication
* * *
B.(1)
* * *
(b) One licensed optometrist member of the board shall be appointed by the
governor from each of the five board districts in accordance with this Subsection.
The governor shall ensure that his appointments demonstrate race, gender sex,
ethnic, and geographical diversity.
* * *
§1104. Louisiana Licensed Professional Counselors Board of Examiners
A. There is hereby created in the Louisiana Department of Health the
Louisiana Licensed Professional Counselors Board of Examiners, hereafter referred
to as the "board", consisting of eleven members who shall be residents of the state
of Louisiana. Each term shall be for four years. Seven appointments to the board,
including one consumer from the public at large, shall be made by the governor from
a list of qualified candidates submitted by the executive board of the Louisiana
Page 25 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
Counseling Association. The consumer member may also apply directly to the office
of the governor. Four appointments to the board shall be made by the governor from
a list of qualified candidates submitted by the executive board of the Louisiana
Association for Marriage and Family Therapy. Each appointment by the governor
shall be submitted to the Senate for confirmation. The governor shall ensure that his
appointments demonstrate race, gender sex, ethnic, and geographical diversity.
* * *
§1172. Membership
A. The board shall consist of seventeen members appointed by the governor,
including two licensed pharmacists from each of the pharmacy districts as provided
in R.S. 37:1173 and one representative of the consumers of Louisiana from the state
at-large who possess the qualifications specified in R.S. 37:1174. The governor shall
ensure that his appointments demonstrate race, gender sex, ethnic, and geographical
diversity.
* * *
§2102. Board of Examiners; creation; domicile; membership; terms of office
A.
* * *
(2) The governor shall ensure that his appointments demonstrate race, gender
sex, ethnic, and geographical diversity.
* * *
§2353. State board of examiners; organization; duties; meetings; fees
A.
* * *
(2) The governor shall appoint members for terms of five years. Each
appointment by the governor shall be subject to Senate confirmation. A board
member shall not be eligible to succeed himself. All psychologist appointments shall
be from a list provided by the Louisiana Psychological Association. The list shall
report the results of an election in which persons qualified for board membership
may nominate themselves and in which licensed members of the Louisiana
Page 26 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
Psychological Association and other persons licensed in accordance with the
provisions of this Chapter are entitled to one vote for each vacancy on the board.
The consumer member may apply directly to the office of the governor. The
governor shall ensure that his appointments demonstrate race, gender sex, ethnic, and
geographical diversity.
* * *
§2403. Physical therapy board; composition
* * *
H. The governor shall ensure that his appointments demonstrate race, gender
sex, ethnic, and geographical diversity.
* * *
§2407. Practice of physical therapy defined
* * *
D. Words used in one gender sex apply also to the other, except as otherwise
clearly indicated by the context.
* * *
§2455. Louisiana Board for Hearing Aid Dealers; composition; districts
* * *
B.(1) The board shall be composed of nine members. Seven members shall
be hearing aid dealers, the eighth member shall be the state health officer or his
representative, and the ninth member shall be fifty years of age or over and shall
serve as a representative of the hearing aid consumers of Louisiana. The seven
hearing aid dealers shall be appointed in the following manner. The Louisiana
Society of Hearing Aid Specialists, chartered by the state, shall submit to the
governor names of not less than fourteen qualified hearing aid dealers, who shall be
actively engaged in the selling and fitting of hearing aids. The governor shall ensure
that his appointments demonstrate race, gender sex, ethnic, and geographical
diversity.
* * *
Page 27 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
§2704. Board of Social Work Examiners
A. There is hereby created a Louisiana State Board of Social Work
Examiners within the Louisiana Department of Health. The board shall be subject
to the provisions of R.S. 36:803. It shall consist of seven members to include six
social workers and one consumer member. The members shall be appointed by the
governor, subject to Senate confirmation. All appointees shall be selected from one
list compiled by all statewide social work membership organizations that have
written bylaws and meet all state and federal laws, and the Louisiana Chapter of the
National Association of Social Workers shall be responsible for the coordination of
this process. The consumer member may apply directly to the office of the governor.
The governor shall ensure that his appointments demonstrate race, gender sex,
ethnic, and geographical diversity. All appointees shall serve no more than two
consecutive full terms. The completion of an unexpired portion of a full term shall
not constitute a full term for purposes of this Section. The board shall consist of the
following members:
* * *
§3061. Board of Electrolysis Examiners
A.
* * *
(2)
* * *
(c) Each appointment by the governor shall be submitted to the Senate for
confirmation. The governor shall ensure that his appointments demonstrate race,
gender sex, ethnic, and geographical diversity.
* * *
§3084. Louisiana State Board of Examiners in Dietetics and Nutrition; membership,
terms, and vacancies; officers; meetings; quorum; compensation
* * *
B.
* * *
Page 28 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
(2) The governor shall ensure that his appointments demonstrate race, gender
sex, ethnic, and geographical diversity.
* * *
§3201. Radiologic Technology Board of Examiners; method of appointment;
qualifications of members
* * *
B.
* * *
(2) Each appointment by the governor shall be submitted to the Senate for
confirmation. The governor shall ensure that his appointments demonstrate race,
gender sex, ethnic, and geographical diversity.
* * *
§3386.2. Addictive Disorder Regulatory Authority
* * *
C. The governor shall ensure that his appointments demonstrate race, gender
sex, ethnic, and geographical diversity. Members of the board shall serve three-year
terms. Members appointed to fill vacancies caused by death, resignation, or removal
shall serve the unexpired terms of their predecessors.
* * *
§3389. Transition; Addictive Disorder Regulatory Authority
* * *
C. The governor shall ensure that his appointments demonstrate race, gender
sex, ethnic, and geographical diversity. Members of the board shall serve three-year
terms. Members appointed to fill vacancies caused by death, resignation, or removal
shall serve the unexpired terms of their predecessors.
* * *
§3444. Louisiana Licensed Professional Vocational Rehabilitation Counselors
Board of Examiners
A. There is hereby created in the Louisiana Department of Health the
Louisiana Licensed Professional Vocational Rehabilitation Counselors Board of
Examiners, referred to hereafter in this Chapter as the "board", consisting of five
Page 29 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
members who shall be residents of the state of Louisiana. The members shall be
appointed by the governor from a list of qualified candidates supplied by the
International Association of Rehabilitation Professionals-Louisiana, as specified in
this Section. The consumer member may apply directly to the office of the governor.
Each term shall be for four years. Each appointment by the governor shall be
submitted to the Senate for confirmation. The governor shall ensure that his
appointments demonstrate race, gender sex, ethnic, and geographical diversity.
* * *
§3463. Board; appointments; terms; removal; compensation; officers
* * *
B.(1) The governor shall appoint, subject to Senate confirmation, members
to the board from a list containing the names of five persons, submitted by the
Louisiana Association of Wholesale Drug Distributors and from a list containing the
names of two persons, submitted by the Pharmaceutical Research and Manufacturers
of America. The consumer member may apply directly to the office of the governor.
In the event of the death or resignation of any member of the board, the governor
shall appoint his successor in the manner of the original appointment for the
remainder of the unexpired term. The governor shall ensure that his appointments
demonstrate race, gender sex, ethnic, and geographical diversity.
* * *
§3554. Louisiana Board of Massage Therapy; creation, membership, qualifications,
terms, vacancies, officers, meetings, reimbursement, liability
A.
* * *
(2) The governor shall ensure that his appointments demonstrate race, gender
sex, ethnic, and geographical diversity.
* * *
§3703. Louisiana Behavior Analyst Board
* * *
B.
* * *
Page 30 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
(3) The governor shall ensure that his appointments demonstrate race, gender
sex, ethnic, and geographical diversity. A vacancy in an unexpired term shall be
filled in the manner of the original appointment for the remainder of the unexpired
term.
* * *
Section 18. R.S. 40:31.61, 101(D)(1), 600.151(D)(1)(l)(ii)(hh) and (m)(iv), and
2403(H)(1) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§31.61. Legislative intent
The Legislature of Louisiana wishes to further efforts by the Parkinson's
community to find a cure for this devastating disease by helping to determine how
many people in the state suffer from Parkinson's and by gathering vital information
from these individuals, such as general age, ethnicity, gender sex, as well as possible
environmental factors that may have played a part in the development of the disease.
Thus, it is the intent of the legislature to establish a system to collect and assess
information and data regarding the incidence of Parkinson's disease in the state.
* * *
§101. Commemorative certificate of miscarried child; requirements
* * *
D.(1) The commemorative certificate shall contain the name of the fetus and
the gender sex, if known. If the name is not furnished by the patient, the vital
records registry may complete the commemorative certificate with the name "Baby
Boy" or "Baby Girl" and the last name of the patient. If the gender sex of the fetus
is unknown, the department shall fill in the commemorative certificate with the name
"Baby" and the last name of the patient.
* * *
§600.151. Louisiana Interagency Council on Homelessness
* * *
D.(1) The membership of the council shall be reflective of all geographic
regions of the state and shall be comprised of the following members:
* * *
Page 31 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
(l)
* * *
(ii) Each person appointed pursuant to this Subparagraph shall have at least
five years of academic or professional expertise in housing or services for people
experiencing homelessness with a focus in one or more of the following areas:
* * *
(hh) Homelessness as it relates to actual or perceived sexual orientation,
gender sex identity, or marital status.
* * *
(m) The executive director of the Louisiana Housing Corporation shall
appoint at least two members with lived experience of homelessness. The members
shall be appointed from a list of nominations submitted jointly by the governing
boards of the continuums of care located in Louisiana. Each member appointed
pursuant to this Subparagraph shall represent as many of the following
subpopulations as possible:
* * *
(iv) People with differing actual or perceived sexual orientation, gender sex
identity, or marital status.
* * *
§2403. Council on Peace Officer Standards and Training
* * *
H.(1) The council may establish and implement curricula and publish
training materials to train peace officers to identify, respond to, and report all crimes
which are directed against individuals or groups, or their property, by reason of their
actual or perceived race, age, gender sex, religion, color, creed, disability, sexual
orientation, national origin, or ancestry.
* * *
Section 19. R.S. 42:2.1(A) and 1132(B)(1)(a) through (c) are hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
Page 32 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
§2.1. Boards, commissions, councils, authorities, entities; composition
A. In making appointments to any board, commission, council, authority, or
other similar entity that has statewide jurisdiction and is established by law, rule,
executive order, or otherwise, the appointing authority shall give due consideration
to the demographics of the population of the state, including but not limited to
geography, gender sex, and race.
* * *
§1132. Board of Ethics
* * *
B. Membership; terms; vacancies; qualifications.
(1) The Board of Ethics shall consist of fifteen members to be selected as
follows:
(a) The governor shall appoint nine members, who shall be representative
of the state's population as near as practicable and who shall be subject to Senate
confirmation. At least one member shall be appointed from each congressional
district, and the governor shall give due consideration to the demographics of the
population of the state, including without limitation geography, gender sex, and race.
Of those nine, the governor shall appoint at least five members, each of whom shall
have been licensed to practice law in this state for at least eight years at the time of
his appointment.
(b) Three members shall be elected by the House of Representatives, who
shall give due consideration to the demographics of the population of the state,
including without limitation geography, gender sex, and race.
(c) Three members shall be elected by the Senate, who shall give due
consideration to the demographics of the population of the state, including without
limitation geography, gender sex, and race.
* * *
Section 20. R.S. 46:153.3(D)(1), 288.5(1), 460.37(B)(10), 1095(A), and
1941.8(A)(introductory paragraph) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
Page 33 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
§153.3. Medical vendor reimbursements; allowable restrictions; peer-based
prescribing and dispensing practice patterns; Medicaid Pharmaceutical and
Therapeutics Committee
* * *
D.(1) The Medicaid Pharmaceutical and Therapeutics Committee,
hereinafter referred to as "the committee", is hereby created within the Louisiana
Department of Health. The committee shall be composed of fifteen members
appointed by the governor and submitted to the Senate for confirmation. The
governor shall ensure that appointments achieve race, gender sex, and geographic
diversity.
* * *
§288.5. Written court report; filing
Within one hundred fifty days after the extended foster care voluntary
placement agreement is signed, the department shall file with the court a written
report that shall contain all of the following:
(1) The youth's name, date of birth, race, gender sex, and current address.
* * *
§460.37. Council on Medicaid Pharmacy Reimbursement; creation; composition,
purpose, and duties of the council
* * *
B.
* * *
(10) Two licensed pharmacists appointed by the Louisiana Board of
Pharmacy who are not currently serving on the board. The board shall strive to
ensure its appointments demonstrate race, gender sex, ethnic, and geographical
diversity.
* * *
Page 34 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
§1095. Board of commissioners; membership; appointment; terms; compensation;
removal
A. The two areas of the district shall be governed by separate governing
boards. Each area of the district shall be governed by a board of thirteen
commissioners, referred to in this Part as the "commission", who shall be qualified
voters and residents of Orleans Parish and who shall reflect the ethnic, cultural, and
gender sex diversity of the parish.
* * *
§1941.8. Children and youth services advisory boards; members; duties
A. Each planning board shall consist of a minimum of eleven, but not more
than twenty-five members. Special care should be given in the appointments to
ensure that the board is representative of the community in terms of gender sex, age,
ethnicity, and geography, as well as knowledge and expertise. Those appointed shall
include the following, if available and willing to serve, but need not be limited to:
* * *
Section 20. R.S. 47:337.14(E)(2) and 1702(6) are hereby amended and reenacted
to read as follows:
§337.14. Central collection commission
* * *
E.
* * *
(2) The central collection commission of the parish of St. Landry shall be
representative of the parish's population by race and gender sex to ensure diversity.
* * *
§1702. Definitions
As used in this Subtitle, the following terms have the meaning ascribed to
them in this Section, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
* * *
Page 35 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
(6) "Person" or "persons", "taxpayer" or "taxpayers" includes firms,
companies, associations and corporations; all words importing the masculine gender
sex apply to females also, and all words in the plural number apply to single
individuals in all cases in which the spirit and intent of this Chapter require it.
* * *
Section 22. R.S. 48:2134(C)(introductory paragraph) is hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
§2134. Ouachita Expressway Authority; creation; board of commissioners;
meetings; quorum
* * *
C. The governing body of the authority shall be a board of commissioners
which is hereby created. The board shall have full power to promulgate rules and
regulations for the maintenance and operation of the authority. The Ouachita
Expressway Authority membership shall be representative as near as practicable by
race and gender sex of the Ouachita parish population as of the most recent federal
decennial census. The board shall be composed of fifteen commissioners as follows:
* * *
Section 23. R.S. 49:1112(B)(1) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1112. Commission established; purposes; membership; officers
* * *
B.(1) The commission shall consist of no fewer than fifteen and no more
than twenty-five voting members. Not more than fifty percent of the commission
membership plus one shall be from the same political party. To the maximum extent
practicable, it shall be balanced according to race, ethnicity, age, disability, and
gender sex characteristics.
* * *
Section 24. R.S. 51:942(A) and 1762(A)(8)(a)(iii) are hereby amended and reenacted
to read as follows:
Page 36 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
§942. Small and emerging businesses
A. The department shall provide for the increased opportunity for small and
emerging businesses to become competitive in a modern economy without regard to
race or gender sex. This purpose shall be accomplished by providing a program of
assistance and promotion. The following provisions of this Section shall be applied
and interpreted to promote this purpose.
* * *
§1762. Prohibitions; data collection; targeted advertising
A. As used in this Chapter, the following terms have the following
meanings:
* * *
(8) "Sensitive personal data" means data collected directly from an account
holder online that provides any of the following:
(a) Information that reveals any of the following about the account holder:
* * *
(iii) Gender. Sex.
* * *
Section 25. R.S. 56:108(A) and 1705(C) are hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
§108. Deer and turkey harvest records and tagging
A. The Wildlife and Fisheries Commission may promulgate and adopt rules
and regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act in relation to
deer or turkey harvest records and tagging. Such rules and regulations may include
the following: tagging requirements, gender sex, age, antler requirements, take,
possession, limit, and reporting requirements.
* * *
§1705. Poverty Point Reservoir Development Dedicated Fund Account
* * *
Page 37 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
C. The Poverty Point Reservoir Development District Board membership
shall be representative of the population of the state based on race and gender sex as
near as practicable.
Section 26. Code of Civil Procedure Article 5055 is hereby amended and reenacted
to read as follows:
Art. 5055. Number; gender sex
Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
(1) Words used in the singular number apply also to the plural; words used
in the plural number include the singular; and .
(2) Words used in one gender sex apply also to the others other sex.
Section 27. Code of Criminal Procedure Articles 4, 795(C), (D), and (E), 989, 992,
994, 997, 998, and 999.1 are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
Art. 4. Number; gender sex
Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
(1) Words used in the singular number apply also to the plural; words used
in the plural number include the singular; and .
(2) Words used in one gender sex apply also to the other.
* * *
Art. 795. Time for challenges; method; peremptory challenges based on race or
gender sex; restrictions
* * *
C. No peremptory challenge made by the state or the defendant shall be
motivated in substantial part on the basis of the race or gender sex of the juror. If
an objection is made that a challenge was motivated in substantial part on the basis
of race or gender sex, and a prima facie case supporting that objection is made by the
objecting party, the court shall demand a satisfactory race or gender sex neutral
reason for the exercise of the challenge. Such demand and disclosure shall be made
outside of the hearing of any juror or prospective juror. The court shall then
determine whether the challenge was motivated in substantial part on the basis of
race or gender sex.
Page 38 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
D. The court shall allow to stand each peremptory challenge exercised for
a race or gender sex neutral reason either apparent from the examination or disclosed
by counsel when required by the court. The provisions of Paragraph C of this Article
and this Paragraph shall not apply when both the state and the defense have exercised
a challenge against the same juror.
E. The court shall allow to stand each peremptory challenge for which a
satisfactory racially neutral or gender sex neutral reason is given. Those jurors who
have been peremptorily challenged and for whom no satisfactory racially neutral or
gender sex neutral reason is apparent or given may be ordered returned to the panel,
or the court may take such other corrective action as it deems appropriate under the
circumstances. The court shall make specific findings regarding each such
challenge.
* * *
Art. 989. Motion for expungement forms to be used
STATE OF LOUISIANA
JUDICIAL DISTRICT FOR THE PARISH OF
______________________________
No.: _____________ Division: "_______"
State of Louisiana
vs.
_______________________________________________________
MOTION FOR EXPUNGEMENT
NOW INTO COURT comes mover, who provides the court with the
following information in connection with this request:
I. DEFENDANT INFORMATION
NAME: ___________________________________________________________
(Last, First, MI)
DOB: ________/______/_______ (MM/DD/YYYY)
GENDER SEX _____ Female _____Male
SSN (last 4 digits): XXX-XX-________
Page 39 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
RACE: _________________
DRIVER LIC.# _________________
ARRESTING AGENCY: __________________________________________
SID# (if available): _________________
ARREST NUMBER (ATN): _________________
AGENCY ITEM NO. _________________
Mover is entitled to expunge the record of his arrest/conviction pursuant to
Louisiana Code of Criminal Procedure Article 971 et seq. and states the following
in support:
II. ARREST INFORMATION
1. Mover was arrested on _______/______/_______ (MM/DD/YYYY)
2. _____ YES _____ NO A supplemental sheet with arrests and/or
convictions is attached after page 2 of this
Motion.
3. Mover was:
_____ YES _____ NO Arrested, but it did not result in conviction
_____ YES _____ NO Convicted of and seeks to expunge a
misdemeanor
_____ YES _____ NO Convicted of and seeks to expunge a felony
_____ YES _____ NO Convicted but determined to be factually
innocent and entitled to compensation for a
wrongful conviction pursuant to the
provisions of R.S. 15:572.8.
4. Mover was booked and/or charged with the following offenses: (List each
offense booked and charged separately. Attach a supplemental sheet, if
necessary.)
____ Yes ____ No ARRESTS THAT DID NOT RESULT IN CONVICTION
NO. 1 La. Rev. Stat. Ann. § _______ : ________
Page 40 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
Name of the offense __________________
( ) Time expired for prosecution __________________
(MM/DD/YYYY)
( ) Not prosecuted for any offense
arising out of this charge.
( ) Pre-trial Diversion Program.
( ) DWI Pre-Trial Diversion Program
and 5 years have elapsed since the
date of arrest.
( ) Charge dismissed
( ) Found not guilty/judgment of acquittal
NO. 2 La. Rev. Stat. Ann. § _______ : ________
Name of the offense __________________
( ) Time expired for prosecution __________________
(MM/DD/YYYY)
( ) Not prosecuted for any
offense arising out of this charge.
( ) Pre-trial Diversion Program.
( ) Charge dismissed
( ) Found not guilty/judgment of acquittal
NO. 3 La. Rev. Stat. Ann. § _______ : ________
Name of the offense __________________
( ) Time expired for prosecution __________________
(MM/DD/YYYY)
( ) Not prosecuted for any offense
arising out of this charge.
( ) Pre-trial Diversion Program.
( ) Charge dismissed
( ) Found not guilty/judgment of acquittal
____ Yes ____ No MISDEMEANOR CONVICTIONS
Page 41 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
NO. 1 La. Rev. Stat. Ann. § _______ : ________
Name of the offense _________________
( ) Conviction set aside/dismissed _____/____/_______
pursuant to C.Cr.P. Art. 894(B) (MM/DD/YYYY)
( ) More than 5 years have passed
since completion of sentence.
NO. 2 La. Rev. Stat. Ann. § _______ : ________
Name of the offense _________________
( ) Conviction set aside/dismissed _____/____/_______
pursuant to C.Cr.P. Art. 894(B) (MM/DD/YYYY)
( ) More than 5 years have passed
since completion of sentence.
____ Yes ____ No FELONY CONVICTIONS
NO. 1 La. Rev. Stat. Ann. § _______ : ________
( ) Conviction set aside/dismissed _____/____/_______
pursuant to C.Cr.P. Art. 893(E) (MM/DD/YYYY)
( ) More than 10 years have passed
since completion of sentence
( ) Received a first offender pardon for an eligible offense
NO. 2 La. Rev. Stat. Ann. § _______ : ________
( ) Conviction set aside/dismissed _____/____/_______
pursuant to C.Cr.P. Art. 893(E) (MM/DD/YYYY)
( ) More than 10 years have passed
since completion of sentence
( ) Received a first offender pardon for an eligible offense
____ Yes ____ No OPERATING A MOTOR VEHICLE WHILE
INTOXICATED CONVICTIONS
Mover has attached the following:
( ) A copy of the proof from the Department of Public Safety and
Corrections, office of motor vehicles, that it has received from the
Page 42 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
clerk of court a certified copy of the record of the plea, fingerprints
of the defendant, and proof of the requirements set forth in C.Cr.P.
Art. 556, which shall include the defendant's date of birth, last four
digits of social security number, and driver's license number
5. Mover has attached to this Motion the following pertinent documents:
G Criminal Background Check from the La. State Police/Parish Sheriff
dated within the past 60 days (required).
G Bill(s) of Information (if any).
G Minute entry showing final disposition of case (if any).
G Certification Letter from the District Attorney for fee waiver (if
eligible).
G Certification Letter from the District Attorney verifying that the
applicant has no convictions or pending applicable criminal charges
in the requisite time periods.
G Certification Letter from the District Attorney verifying that the
charges were refused.
G Certification Letter from the District Attorney verifying that the
applicant did not participate in a pretrial diversion program.
G A copy of a first offender pardon.
G A copy of the order waiving the sex offender registration and
notification requirements.
G A copy of the court order determination of factual innocence and
order of compensation for a wrongful conviction pursuant to the
provisions of R.S. 15:572.8 if applicable.
The Mover prays that if there is no objection timely filed by the arresting law
enforcement agency, the district attorney's office, or the Louisiana Bureau of
Criminal Identification and Information, that an order be issued herein ordering the
expungement of the record of arrest and/or conviction set forth above, including all
photographs, fingerprints, disposition, or any other such information, which record
shall be confidential and no longer considered a public record, nor be made available
Page 43 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
to other persons, except a prosecutor, member of a law enforcement agency, or a
judge who may request such information in writing, certifying that such request is
for the purpose of prosecuting, investigating, or enforcing the criminal law, for the
purpose of any other statutorily defined law enforcement or administrative duties,
or for the purpose of the requirements of sex offender registration and notification
pursuant to the provisions of R.S. 15:541 et seq. or as an order of this Court to any
other person for good cause shown, or as otherwise authorized by law.
If an "Affidavit of No Opposition" by each agency named herein is attached
hereto and made a part hereof, Defendant requests that no contradictory hearing be
required and the Motion be granted ex parte.
Respectfully submitted,
____________________________________
Signature of Attorney for Mover/Defendant
____________________________________
Attorney for Mover/Defendant Name
____________________________________
Attorney's Bar Roll No.
____________________________________
Address

____________________________________
City, State, ZIP Code
____________________________________
Telephone Number
Page 44 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
If not represented by counsel:
____________________________________
Signature of Mover/Defendant
____________________________________
Mover/Defendant Name
____________________________________
Address

____________________________________
City, State, ZIP Code
____________________________________
Telephone Number
* * *
Art. 992. Order of expungement form to be used
STATE OF LOUISIANA
JUDICIAL DISTRICT FOR THE PARISH OF
______________________________
No.: ____________ Division: "_______"
State of Louisiana
vs.
_______________________________________________________
ORDER OF EXPUNGEMENT OF ARREST/CONVICTION RECORD
Considering the Motion for Expungement
G The hearing conducted and evidence adduced herein, OR
G Affidavits of No Opposition filed,
Page 45 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
IT IS ORDERED, ADJUDGED AND DECREED
G THE MOTION IS DENIED for No(s). __________ for the following
reasons (check all that apply):
G More than five years have not elapsed since Mover completed the
misdemeanor conviction sentence.
G More than ten years have not elapsed since Mover completed the felony
conviction sentence.
G Mover was convicted of one of the following ineligible felony
offenses:
G A violation of the Uniform Controlled Dangerous Substances Law
which is ineligible to be expunged.
G An offense currently listed as a sex offense that requires registration
pursuant to R.S. 15:540 et seq., at the time the Motion was filed,
regardless of whether the duty to register was ever imposed.
G An offense defined or enumerated as a "crime of violence" pursuant
to R.S. 14:2(B) at the time the Motion was filed.
G The arrest and conviction being sought to have expunged is for
operating a motor vehicle while intoxicated and a copy of the proof
from the Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of
motor vehicles, is not attached as required by C.Cr.P. Art. 984(A).
G Mover was convicted of a misdemeanor which arose from
circumstances involving a sex offense as defined in R.S. 15:541.
G Mover was convicted of misdemeanor offense of domestic abuse
battery which was not dismissed pursuant to C.Cr.P. Art. 894(B).
G Mover did not complete pretrial diversion.
G The charges against the mover were not dismissed or refused.
G Mover's felony conviction was not set aside and dismissed pursuant
to C.Cr.P. Art. 893(E).
G Mover's felony conviction was not set aside and dismissed pursuant
to C.Cr.P. Art. 894(B).
Page 46 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
G Mover completed a DWI pretrial diversion program, but five years
have not elapsed since the mover's date of arrest.
G Mover's conviction for felony carnal knowledge of a juvenile is not
defined as misdemeanor carnal knowledge of a juvenile had the
mover been convicted on or after August 15, 2001.
G Mover was not convicted of a crime that would be eligible for
expungement as required by C.Cr.P. Art. 978(E)(1).
G Mover has criminal charges pending against him.
G Mover was convicted of a criminal offense during the ten-year
period, excluding any noncapital felony during the preceding ten-year
period that would otherwise be eligible for expungement pursuant to
C.Cr.P. Art. 978(F).
G Mover received a first offender pardon but for an ineligible offense.
G Mover did not receive a first offender pardon.
G Denial for any other reason provided by law with attached reasons for
denial.
G THE MOTION IS HEREBY GRANTED for No(s). ____________
and all agencies are ordered to expunge the record of arrest/conviction and any
photographs, fingerprints, or any other such information of any kind maintained in
connection with the Arrest(s)/Conviction(s) in the above-captioned matter, which
record shall be confidential and no longer considered a public record, nor be
available to other persons except a prosecutor, member of a law enforcement agency,
or a judge who may request such information in writing certifying that such request
is for the purpose of prosecuting, investigating, or enforcing the criminal law, for the
purpose of any other statutorily defined law enforcement or administrative duties,
or for the purpose of the requirements of sex offender registration and notification
pursuant to the provisions of R.S. 15:541 et seq. or upon an order of this Court to any
other person for good cause shown, or as otherwise authorized by law.
G THE MOTION IS HEREBY GRANTED FOR EXPUNGEMENT
BY REDACTION If the record includes more than one individual and the mover
Page 47 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
is entitled to expungement by redaction pursuant to Code of Criminal Procedure
Article 985, for No(s). ____________ and all agencies are ordered to expunge the
record of arrest/conviction and any photographs, fingerprints, or any other such
information of any kind maintained in relation to the Arrest(s)/Conviction(s) in the
above-captioned matter as they relate to the mover only. The record shall be
confidential and no longer considered a public record, nor be available to other
persons except a prosecutor, member of a law enforcement agency, or a judge who
may request such information in writing certifying that such request is for the
purpose of prosecuting, investigating, or enforcing the criminal law, for the purpose
of any other statutorily defined law enforcement or administrative duties, or for the
purpose of the requirements of sex offender registration and notification pursuant to
the provisions of R.S. 15:541 et seq. or upon an order of this Court to any other
person for good cause shown, or as otherwise authorized by law.
NAME: _______________________________________________________
(Last, First, MI)
DOB: ______/_____/______ (MM/DD/YY)
GENDER SEX: _____ Female _____Male
SSN (last 4 digits): XXX-XX-_________
RACE: _________________
DRIVER LIC.# _________________
ARRESTING AGENCY: ______________________________________
SID# (if available): _________________
ARREST NUMBER (ATN): _________________
AGENCY ITEM NUMBER: _________________
ARREST DATE: ______/_____/______ (MM/DD/YY)
THUS ORDERED AND SIGNED this _____ day of _______________, 20____
at ________________________, Louisiana.
___________________________________
JUDGE
Page 48 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
PLEASE SERVE:
1. District Attorney: ______________________________________________
2. Arresting Agency: _____________________________________________
3. Parish Sheriff:________________________________________________
4. Louisiana Bureau of Criminal Identification and Information___________
5. Attorney for Defendant (or defendant)_____________________________
6. Clerk of Court ____________________________
* * *
Art. 994. Motion for interim expungement form to be used
STATE OF LOUISIANA
JUDICIAL DISTRICT FOR THE PARISH OF
______________________________
No.: _____________ Division: "_______"
State of Louisiana
vs.
_______________________________________________________
MOTION FOR INTERIM EXPUNGEMENT
NOW INTO COURT comes mover, who provides the court with the
following information in connection with this request:
I. DEFENDANT INFORMATION
NAME: ___________________________________________________________
(Last, First, MI)
DOB: ________/______/_______ (MM/DD/YYYY)
GENDER SEX _____ Female _____Male
SSN (last 4 digits): XXX-XX-________
RACE: _________________
DRIVER LIC.# _________________
ARRESTING AGENCY: __________________________________________
SID# (if available): _________________
ARREST NUMBER (ATN): _________________
Page 49 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
AGENCY ITEM NO. ________________
Mover is entitled to an interim expungement of the entry of the felony
charge(s) of his arrest pursuant to Louisiana Code of Criminal Procedure Article
985.1 and states the following in support:
II. ARREST INFORMATION
1. Mover was arrested on _______/______/_______ (MM/DD/YYYY)
2. _____ YES _____ NO A supplemental sheet with arrests and/or
convictions is attached after page 2 of this
Motion.
3. Mover was:
_____ YES _____ NO Arrested for a felony offense.
_____ YES _____ NO Convicted of a misdemeanor arising out of
that felony offense.
4. Mover was booked and/or charged with the following offenses: (List each
offense booked and charged separately. Attach a supplemental sheet, if
necessary.)
____ Yes ____ No FELONY ARREST THAT RESULTED IN A
MISDEMEANOR CONVICTION
NO. 1 La. Rev. Stat. Ann. § _______ : ________
Name of the offense __________________
__________________
(MM/DD/YYYY)
( ) Felony charge dismissed.
( ) Convicted of misdemeanor offense arising out of
felony arrest.
Page 50 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
5. Mover has attached to his Motion a criminal background check from the
Louisiana State Police/Parish Sheriff dated within the past sixty days
(required).
The mover prays that if there is no objection timely filed by the arresting law
enforcement agency, the District Attorney's Office, or the Louisiana Bureau of
Criminal Identification and Information, that an order be issued herein ordering the
Louisiana Bureau of Criminal Identification and Information to expunge the entry
of the felony charge(s) listed contained in the criminal history; and further that the
Clerk of Court, District Attorney, and arresting law enforcement agency expunge the
entry of those felony charge(s) from any public indices.
If an "Affidavit of No Opposition" by each agency named herein is attached
hereto and made a part hereof, Defendant requests that no contradictory hearing be
required and the Motion be granted ex parte.
Respectfully submitted,
____________________________________
Signature of Attorney for Mover/Defendant
____________________________________
Attorney for Mover/Defendant Name
____________________________________
Attorney's Bar Roll No.
____________________________________
Address
____________________________________
City, State, ZIP Code
____________________________________
Telephone Number
If not represented by counsel:
____________________________________
Signature of Mover/Defendant
____________________________________
Mover/Defendant Name
____________________________________
Address
____________________________________
City, State, ZIP Code
Page 51 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
____________________________________
Telephone Number
PLEASE SERVE:
1. District Attorney______________________________________________
2. Louisiana Bureau of Criminal Identification and Information___________
3. Arresting Agency ______________________________________________
* * *
Art. 997. Certification of human trafficking victim status
STATE OF LOUISIANA
__________ JUDICIAL DISTRICT FOR THE PARISH OF ____________________
NO.:_________________________ DIVISION: _______________
STATE OF LOUISIANA
vs.
________________________________
CERTIFICATION OF HUMAN TRAFFICKING VICTIM STATUS
In accordance with the provisions of Louisiana Code of Criminal Procedure Article
983, the Office of the District Attorney has reviewed and determined that one,
________________________________________________________________________,
R A C E / G E N D E R S E X : _ _ _ _ ___________________DOB:
___________________________, SSN:_________________________________, has
established by a preponderance of the evidence proof of status as a victim of human
trafficking in accordance with the provisions of R.S. 14:46.2, for the following offense(s),
detailed specifically as follows:
(If more than one offense, each relevant offense must be specifically listed in the
following format)
OFFENSE:________________________
DOCKET NO:_____________________
CHARGE:________________________
DATE OF ARREST:________________
ARRESTING AGENCY:____________
CITY/PARISH OF ARREST:___________________
FURTHER, that the above offense(s) for which this Certification issued was
committed, in substantial part, as a result of the above-named being a victim of human
trafficking, in accordance with R.S. 14:46.2.
FURTHER, this Certification shall be considered as prima facie evidence of the
victim's status in similar eligible crimes committed within other Louisiana jurisdictions
during the time period in which the above-named was a victim of human trafficking.
FURTHER, all applicable time delays pertaining to expungement contained in
Louisiana Code of Criminal Procedure Articles 977 and 978 shall be waived when presented
to the clerk of court with an application for expungement of the above-specified offense(s).
FURTHER, any application for expungement of the above-specified offense(s) shall
be at no cost to the above-named victim.
_______________________ __________________________________
DATE DISTRICT ATTORNEY
PARISH OF
Page 52 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
_____________ JUDICIAL DISTRICT
STATE OF LOUISIANA
* * *
Art. 998. Motion for expungement form to be used for certain misdemeanor
convictions
STATE OF LOUISIANA
JUDICIAL DISTRICT FOR THE PARISH OF
______________________________
No.: _____________ Division: "_______"
State of Louisiana
vs.
_______________________________________________________
MOTION FOR EXPUNGEMENT FOR MISDEMEANOR CONVICTION FOR A
FIRST OFFENSE POSSESSION OF MARIJUANA
NOW INTO COURT comes mover, who provides the court with the following
information in connection with this request:
I. DEFENDANT INFORMATION
NAME: ___________________________________________________________
(Last, First, MI)
DOB: ________/______/_______ (MM/DD/YYYY)
GENDER SEX _____ Female _____Male
SSN (last 4 digits): XXX-XX-________
RACE: _________________
DRIVER LIC.# _________________
ARRESTING AGENCY: __________________________________________
SID# (if available): _________________
ARREST NUMBER (ATN): _________________
AGENCY ITEM NO. _________________
Mover is entitled to expunge the record of his arrest/conviction pursuant to Louisiana
Code of Criminal Procedure Article 971 et seq. and states the following in support:
II. MISDEMEANOR CONVICTION FOR A FIRST OFFENSE POSSESSION
OF MARIJUANA
1. Mover was convicted on _______/______/_______ (MM/DD/YYYY)
The Mover prays that if there is no objection timely filed by the arresting law
enforcement agency, the district attorney's office, or the Louisiana Bureau of
Criminal Identification and Information, that an order be issued herein ordering the
expungement of the record of arrest and/or conviction set forth above, including all
photographs, fingerprints, disposition, or any other such information, which record
shall be confidential and no longer considered a public record, nor be made available
to other persons, except a prosecutor, member of a law enforcement agency, or a
judge who may request such information in writing, certifying that such request is
for the purpose of prosecuting, investigating, or enforcing the criminal law, for the
purpose of any other statutorily defined law enforcement or administrative duties,
or for the purpose of the requirements of sex offender registration and notification
pursuant to the provisions of R.S. 15:541 et seq. or as an order of this court to any
other person for good cause shown, or as otherwise authorized by law.
If an "Affidavit of No Opposition" by each agency named herein is attached hereto
and made a part hereof, defendant requests that no contradictory hearing be required
and the motion be granted ex parte.
Respectfully submitted,
____________________________________
Signature of Attorney for Mover/Defendant
____________________________________
Attorney for Mover/Defendant Name
____________________________________
Attorney's Bar Roll No.
Page 53 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
____________________________________
Address
____________________________________
City, State, ZIP Code
____________________________________
Telephone Number
If not represented by counsel:
____________________________________
Signature of Mover/Defendant
____________________________________
Mover/Defendant Name
____________________________________
Address
____________________________________
City, State, ZIP Code
____________________________________
Telephone Number
* * *
Art. 999.1. Order form to be used; expedited expungement
JUDICIAL DISTRICT FOR THE PARISH OF
______________________________
No.: _____________ Division: "_______"
State of Louisiana
vs.
_______________________________________________________
ORDER OF EXPUNGEMENT UNDER
CODE OF CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE 999
Pursuant to Code of Criminal Procedure Article 999, wherein all of the following
applies,
(1) The defendant was seventeen years of age when the defendant was arrested or
charged with any criminal offense as provided in Title 14 or 40 of the Louisiana Revised
Statutes of 1950.
(2) The district attorney, for any reason, declined to prosecute all offenses arising
out of that arrest, including the reason that the person successfully completed a pretrial
diversion program.
(3) Prosecution was instituted and such proceedings have been finally disposed of
by dismissal, sustaining of a motion to quash, or acquittal.
IT IS HEREBY ORDERED, ADJUDGED, AND DECREED that the following
charges and arrest on the dates provided herein be expunged.
THUS ORDERED AND SIGNED, ADJUDGED, AND DECREED this ____ day
of ___________, 20 ____ at ______________, Louisiana, ___________________________.
___________________________
JUDGE
DEFENDANT INFORMATION:
NAME:________________________________________________
First Middle Last
DATE OF BIRTH:_____________
GENDER SEX:_____________
SS#___________________________
RACE___________________________
DRIVER'S LICENSE#___________________
ARRESTING AGENCY___________________
SID#___________________
ARREST NUMBER (ATN)___________________
AGENCY ITEM NO:________________________
Page 54 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
PLEASE SERVE:
1. District Attorney:________________________________________________
2. Arresting Agency:_______________________________________________
3. Parish Sheriff:_______________________________________
4. Louisiana Bureau of Criminal Identification and Information
_____________________________
5. Attorney for Defendant (or defendant)____________________________
6. Clerk of Court ____________________________
* * *
Section 28. Children's Code Article 106, 720(B)(1), 725, 1217.1(A)(4), and
1239.1(A)(4) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
Art. 106. Number, gender sex
Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
(1) Words used in the singular number apply also to the the plural; words
used in the plural number include the singular.
(2) Words used in one gender sex apply also to the other.
* * *
Art. 720. Motion for guardianship
* * *
B. The motion, case review report, or case plan shall include all of the
following:
(1) The name and gender sex of the child, and the date and place of the
child's birth.
* * *
Art. 725. Findings and purpose
The legislature finds that arresting, prosecuting, and incarcerating victimized
children serves to re-traumatize them and to increase their feelings of low self-
esteem, which only makes the process of recovery more difficult. Both federal and
international law recognize that sexually exploited children are the victims of crime
and should be treated as such. Therefore, sexually exploited children should not be
prosecuted for criminal acts related to prostitution. Instead, sexually exploited
children should, where possible, be diverted into services that address the needs of
these children outside of the justice system. Sexually exploited children deserve the
protection of child welfare services, including diversion, crisis intervention,
Page 55 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
counseling, and emergency housing services. The purpose of this Chapter is to
protect a child from further victimization after the child is discovered to be a
sexually exploited child by ensuring that a child protective response is in place in the
state. This is to be accomplished by presuming that any child engaged in prostitution,
prostitution by massage, or crime against nature by solicitation is a victim of sex
trafficking and providing these children with the appropriate care and services where
possible. In determining the need for and capacity of services that may be provided,
the Department of Children and Family Services shall recognize that sexually
exploited children have separate and distinct service needs according to gender sex,
and every effort should be made to ensure these children are not prosecuted or
treated as juvenile delinquents, but instead are given the appropriate social services.
* * *
Art. 1217.1. Reporting requirement; statistical availability
A. For each adopted child, the court shall ensure that the department receives
all of the following information:
* * *
(4) The gender sex of the child.
* * *
Art. 1239.1. Reporting requirement; statistical availability
A. For each adopted child, the court shall ensure that the department receives
all of the following information:
* * *
(4) The gender sex of the child.
* * *
Page 56 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 578 ENROLLED
Section 29. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby authorized and directed to
change all references in law from gender to sex as it pertains to personally identifiable
information of an individual.
Section 30. This Act shall be known as the "Restoring Biological Truth Act".
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 57 of 57
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.